Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 36 Arbitration

Cross references. —

As to arbitration in connection with justice of the peace courts, see §§

1-21-801

to

1-21-804

.

For provision requiring legislature to provide for voluntary submission of differences to arbitrators, see art. 19, § 8, Wyo. Const.

As to arbitration of claims for value of diseased animals killed by order of state veterinarian, see §§

11-19-106

to

11-19-108

.

As to arbitration of claims for damages done by game animals and birds, see §

23-1-901

.

As to arbitration in connection with collective bargaining for firefighters, see §§

27-10-105

to

27-10-107

.

As to arbitration of controversies by public service commission, see §

37-2-113

.

Arbitration is method of voluntary settlement of disputes embedded in public policy of Wyoming

and is favored by the supreme court of Wyoming. In re Town of Greybull, 560 P.2d 1172,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1977).

Informal divorce proceeding. —

An informal divorce proceeding was not the type of “binding arbitration” that precluded an appeal where: (1) this article was never invoked by either the parties or the court; (2) the record made no reference to any arbitration agreement; and (3) the court acknowledged that the issues were appealable. Scherer v. Scherer, 931 P.2d 251,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1997), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Cited

in

Weston County Hosp. Joint Powers Bd. v. Westates Constr. Co., 841 P.2d 841,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 1992).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Arbitration — Jurisdiction from Participations. Hot Springs County Sch. Dist. v. Strube Constr. Co., 715 P.2d 540,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 505

(Wyo. 1986),” see XXII Land & Water L. Rev. 183 (1987).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

4 Am. Jur. 2d Alternative Dispute Resolution §§ 8 to 13, 70 to 217; 5 Am. Jur. 2d Arbitration and Award § 1 et seq.

Constitutionality of arbitration statutes,
55 ALR2d 432.

Statute of limitations as bar to arbitration under agreement, 94 ALR3d 533.

Defendant's participation in action as waiver of right to arbitration of dispute involved therein, 98 ALR3d 767.

Claim of fraud in inducement of contract as subject to compulsory arbitration clause contained in contract, 11 ALR4th 774.

Liability of organization sponsoring or administering arbitration to parties involved in proceeding, 41 ALR4th 1013.

Which statute of limitations applies to efforts to compel arbitration of a dispute, 77 ALR4th 1071.

Validity and construction of provisions for arbitration of disputes as to alimony or support payments or child visitation or custody matters, 38 ALR5th 69.

Alternative dispute resolution: sanctions for failure to participate in good faith in, or comply with agreement made in, mediation, 43 ALR5th 545.

Awarding attorneys' fees in connection with arbitration, 60 ALR5th 669.

Re-exhaustion of arbitration procedure as appropriate course for resolving backpay issues arising as a result of resolution of grievance, 59 ALR Fed 501.

Employee's right to intervene in federal judicial proceeding concerning labor arbitration, 59 ALR Fed 733.

What statute of limitations applies to action to compel arbitration
pursuant to § 301 of Labor Management Relations Act (29 USC § 185),
96 ALR Fed 378.

Consolidation by federal court of arbitration proceedings brought
under Federal Arbitration Act (9 USC § 4),
104 ALR Fed 251.

Construction and application of § 10(a)(4) of Federal Arbitration
Act (9 USCS § 10(a)(4)) providing for vacating of arbitration awards where arbitrators
exceed or imperfectly execute powers,
136 ALR Fed 183.

Construction and application of § 10(a)(1)-(3) of Federal Arbitration
Act (9 USCS § 10(a)(1)-(3)) providing for vacating of arbitration awards where
award procured by fraud, corruption, or undue means, where arbitrators
evidence partiality or corruption and where arbitrators engage in
particular acts of misbehavior,
141 ALR Fed 1.

Vacating on public policy grounds arbitration awards reinstating discharged employees, 142 ALR Fed 387.

Refusal to enforce foreign arbitration awards on public policy grounds, 144 ALR Fed 481.

Enforceability of arbitration clauses in collective bargaining agreements as regards claims under federal civil rights statutes 152 ALR Fed 75.

6 C.J.S. Arbitration and Award § 1 et seq.

§ 1-36-101.
Short title.

W.S.

1-36-101

through

1-36-119

may be cited as the Uniform Arbitration Act.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 116, § 22; W.S. 1957, § 1-1048.1; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-37-101

.

Challenge of arbitration award has always been available. —

Challenge of an arbitration award under the common law, or under statutes similar to this chapter, although limited in extent, has always been available. In re Appeal of Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 391 P.2d 489,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1964).

Cited

in

Oil Chem. & Atomic Workers Union v. Great Lakes Carbon Corp., 376 P.2d 640,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1962); Vogt v. MBNA Am. Bank, 2008 WY 26, 178 P.3d 405,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Mar. 6, 2008).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Conflict of laws as to validity and effect of arbitration provision in contract for purchase or sale of goods, products or services, 95 ALR3d 1145.

Setting aside arbitration award on ground of interest or bias of arbitrators — insurance appraisals or arbitrations, 63 ALR5th 675.

Setting aside arbitration award on ground of interest or bias of arbitrators—torts, 64 ALR5th 475.

Validity and effect under state law of arbitration agreement provision for alternative method of appointment of arbitrator where one party fails or refuses to follow appointment procedure specified in agreement, 75 ALR5th 595.

Validity and effect under Federal Arbitration Act (9 U.S.C. § 1 et seq.) of arbitration agreement provision for alternative
method of appointment of arbitrator where one party fails or refuses
to follow appointment procedure specified in agreement,
159 ALR Fed 1.

§ 1-36-102.
“Court” defined; jurisdiction.

“Court” means the district
court having jurisdiction of the parties. An agreement providing for
arbitration in this state may be enforced by the court in the county
where the parties to the controversy reside or may be personally served.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 116, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 1-1048.2; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-37-102

.

Quoted

in

Vogt v. MBNA Am. Bank, 2008 WY 26, 178 P.3d 405,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Mar. 6, 2008).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of agreement between attorney and client to arbitrate disputes arising between them, 26 ALR5th 107.

§ 1-36-103.
Written agreement to submit controversy to arbitration valid.

A written agreement to
submit any existing or future controversy to arbitration is valid,
enforceable and irrevocable, save upon such grounds as exist at law
or in equity for the revocation of the contract. This includes arbitration
agreements between employers and employees or between their respective
representatives unless otherwise provided in the agreement.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 116, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 1-1048.3; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-37-103

.

Arbitration matter of contract. —

Although arbitration is favored, it is a matter of contract, and a party cannot be required to submit any dispute to arbitration which he has not agreed to submit. Panhandle E. Pipe Line Co. v. Smith, 637 P.2d 1020,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 403

(Wyo. 1981).

The right to have a dispute submitted to arbitration is a contractual right. Panhandle E. Pipe Line Co. v. Smith, 637 P.2d 1020,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 403

(Wyo. 1981).

District court erred in denying a nursing home's motion to compel arbitration in a wrongful death action alleging negligence where a general power of attorney unambiguously gave the decedent's older daughter actual authority to sign an arbitration agreement on the decedent's behalf, and the agreement was neither unconscionable nor unenforceable. Kindred Healthcare Operating, Inc. v. Boyd, 2017 WY 122, 403 P.3d 1014,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 2017).

And right to arbitration may be waived either expressly or implicitly.

Panhandle E. Pipe Line Co. v. Smith, 637 P.2d 1020,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 403

(Wyo. 1981).

Or estopped. —

Even where a dispute is subject to arbitration, there are certain instances where a party asserting arbitration is estopped by his own conduct to rely on unexhausted arbitration procedures. Panhandle E. Pipe Line Co. v. Smith, 637 P.2d 1020,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 403

(Wyo. 1981).

Arbitration provision severable from remainder of contract. —

Wyoming has not adopted the revised Uniform Arbitration Act, but because the statute, like the Federal Arbitration Act, addresses the validity and enforceability of a written agreement to submit a controversy to arbitration without mention of the validity of the contract in which it is contained, the Wyoming Supreme Court too will follow the majority of states and recognize that an arbitration provision is severable from the remainder of the contract. Inman v. Grimmer, 2021 WY 55, 485 P.3d 396,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 2021).

Court to decide whether dispute subject to arbitration. —

The courts are to decide the question of whether a grievance or dispute arises under the terms of a bargaining agreement and should be arbitrated, unless the agreement clearly demonstrates that the question is reserved to the arbitrator. Panhandle E. Pipe Line Co. v. Smith, 637 P.2d 1020,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 403

(Wyo. 1981).

Court review limited to enforceability of arbitration provision. —

District court properly applied both Utah’s and Wyoming’s arbitration statutes when, after identifying that appellant challenged both the engagement agreement and the arbitration provision, it limited its review to the enforceability of the arbitration provision and correctly left the question of the engagement agreement’s enforceability to the arbitrator. Inman v. Grimmer, 2021 WY 55, 485 P.3d 396,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 2021).

Informal divorce proceedings. —

An informal divorce proceeding was not the type of “binding arbitration” that precluded an appeal where: (1) this article was never invoked by either the parties or the court; (2) the record made no reference to any arbitration agreement; and (3) the court acknowledged that the issues were appealable. Scherer v. Scherer, 931 P.2d 251,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1997), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Party, by participating in arbitration proceedings without
objection, waived objection to arbitrability. —

Because an agreement to arbitrate need not be written and can arise as the result of the conduct of parties to an existing dispute regardless of whether or not they have previously contracted for arbitration, a party, by participating in arbitration proceedings, waived its objections to the arbitrability of the dispute. While the party moved to dismiss the arbitration for untimely filing at the commencement of the hearing, such a motion could not be reshaped into an objection to jurisdiction on the grounds there was no agreement to arbitrate. The opportunity to defend or be heard upon the merits of the case was not, as the party claimed, lost forever, as a party who proceeds with arbitration over his explicit objections as to arbitrability is not foreclosed from raising the issue on a motion to confirm or vacate the award in the district court. Hot Springs County Sch. Dist. v. Strube Constr. Co., 715 P.2d 540,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 505

(Wyo. 1986).

County as party to arbitration agreement. —

In action based on award by arbitrators for damages caused by location of public road, evidence was insufficient to show county board authorized arbitration agreement or ratified it, or that plaintiff's deed, pursuant to arbitration agreement, was delivered to or accepted by county. Kelly v. Board of Comm'rs, 24 Wyo. 386, 159 P. 1086,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1916).

Applied

in

In re Town of Greybull, 560 P.2d 1172,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1977); T & M Properties v. ZVFK Architects & Planners, 661 P.2d 1040,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1983).

Quoted

in

Gibson v. Wal-Mart Stores, Inc., 181 F.3d 1163, 1999 U.S. App. LEXIS 14114 (10th Cir. 1999).

Cited

in

American Nat'l Bank v. Cheyenne Hous. Auth., 562 P.2d 1017,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 248

(Wyo. 1977).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Enforcement of contractual arbitration clause as affected by expiration of contract prior to demand for arbitration, 5 ALR3d 1008.

Validity and enforceability of provision for binding arbitration and waiver thereof, 24 ALR3d 1325.

Breach or repudiation of collective labor contract as subject to or as affecting right to enforce arbitration provision in contract, 29 ALR3d 688.

Breach or repudiation of contract as affecting right to enforce arbitration clause therein, 32 ALR3d 377.

Conflict of laws as to a validity and effect of arbitration provision in contract for purchase or sale of goods, products or services, 95 ALR3d 1145.

Claim of fraud in inducement of contract as subject to compulsory arbitration clause contained in contract, 11 ALR4th 774.

Attorney's submission of dispute to arbitration, or amendment of arbitration agreement, without client's knowledge or consent, 48 ALR4th 127.

Enforcement of arbitration agreement contained in construction contract by or against nonsignatory, 100 ALR5th 481.

Disposition by bankruptcy court of request for arbitration pursuant to arbitration agreement to which debtor in bankruptcy is a party, 72 ALR Fed 890.

§ 1-36-104.
Duty of court on application of party to arbitrate.

On application of a party showing an arbitration agreement and the opposing party’s refusal to arbitrate, the court shall order the parties to proceed with arbitration. If the opposing party denies the existence of the agreement to arbitrate, the court shall proceed summarily to determine the issue raised and shall order or deny arbitration accordingly.

If an issue referable to arbitration under the alleged agreement is involved in an action or proceeding pending in a court having jurisdiction to hear applications to compel arbitration, the application shall be made therein. Otherwise the application shall be made in the court of proper venue.

Any action or proceeding involving an issue subject to arbitration shall be stayed if an order for arbitration or an application therefor has been made or, if the issue is severable, the stay may be with respect thereto only. When the application is made in such action or proceeding, the order for arbitration shall include such stay.

An order for arbitration shall not be refused on the ground that the claim in issue lacks merit or because any fault or grounds for the claim sought to be arbitrated have not been shown.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 116, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 1-1048.4; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-37-104

.

Strong policy exists favoring arbitration of disputes where parties have bargained for this procedure

in their contract. American Nat'l Bank v. Cheyenne Hous. Auth., 562 P.2d 1017,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 248

(Wyo. 1977).

In the face of an arbitration clause which is couched in broad terms, litigation instead of arbitration should not be available at the option of a party. American Nat'l Bank v. Cheyenne Hous. Auth., 562 P.2d 1017,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 248

(Wyo. 1977).

The role of the court,

where one party seeks to enforce an arbitration agreement and the other party contends that the agreement does not apply to the dispute, is to proceed summarily to the determination of the issue so raised. American Nat'l Bank v. Cheyenne Hous. Auth., 562 P.2d 1017,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 248

(Wyo. 1977).

Stay of underlying action. —

Statute mandates that the court must stay the underlying action when it orders the parties to arbitrate; thus, the district court erred when it dismissed appellant’s legal malpractice action. Inman v. Grimmer, 2021 WY 55, 485 P.3d 396,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 2021).

District court must determine arbitrability in light of all
contract terms. —

The district court is obligated to determine the question of arbitrability in the light of all the contract terms which form the agreement to arbitrate. Where the parties detailed that the agreement to arbitrate would not extend beyond any applicable statute of limitations, the district court was compelled to ascertain that issue as a part of its determination whether an agreement to arbitrate existed. Pioneer Water & Sewer Dist. v. Civil Eng'g Professionals, 905 P.2d 1245,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1995).

Burden of demonstrating arbitrability. —

Under the prescribed statutory procedure the burden of demonstrating arbitrability would be upon the party asserting it. American Nat'l Bank v. Cheyenne Hous. Auth., 562 P.2d 1017,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 248

(Wyo. 1977).

Fraudulent agreement to arbitrate. —

Investors' claim that an arbitration clause in an investment contract was the product of fraud was a “gateway issue” that was properly determined by a court and not an arbitrator, and the broad arbitration clause did not show a clear and unmistakable intent to arbitrate. Thus, a district court did not err by finding that claims of fraud, breach of contract, and negligence were not subject to arbitration. Fox v. Tanner, 2004 WY 157, 101 P.3d 939,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 2004).

Party's refusal to arbitrate self evident. —

District court erred when it interpreted subsection (a) of this section to mean that a party applying to the court must show both an arbitration agreement and the opposing party's refusal to arbitrate and found plaintiff's complaint deficient for its failure to include defendant's refusal to arbitrate; filing the complaint to compel arbitration is self evident of the opposing party's refusal to arbitrate. Jackson State Bank v. Homar, 837 P.2d 1081,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1992).

Contractor waived arbitration. —

Contractor waived his right to have the parties' disputes arbitrated by failing to request that the trial court order the parties to arbitrate their differences under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-36-104

. Scherer v. Schuler Custom Homes Constr., 2004 WY 109, 98 P.3d 159,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 2004), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. Oct. 19, 2004).

Party, by participating in arbitration proceedings without
objection, waived objection to arbitrability. —

Because an agreement to arbitrate need not be written and can arise as the result of the conduct of parties to an existing dispute regardless of whether or not they have previously contracted for arbitration, a party, by participating in arbitration proceedings, waived its objections to the arbitrability of the dispute. While the party moved to dismiss the arbitration for untimely filing at the commencement of the hearing, such a motion could not be reshaped into an objection to jurisdiction on the grounds there was no agreement to arbitrate. The opportunity to defend or be heard upon the merits of the case was not, as the party claimed, lost forever, as a party who proceeds with arbitration over his explicit objections as to arbitrability is not foreclosed from raising the issue on a motion to confirm or vacate the award in the district court. Hot Springs County Sch. Dist. v. Strube Constr. Co., 715 P.2d 540,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 505

(Wyo. 1986).

Cited

in

Garaman, Inc. v. Williams, 912 P.2d 1121,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Disposition by bankruptcy court of request for arbitration pursuant to arbitration agreement to which debtor in bankruptcy is a party, 72 ALR Fed 890.

§ 1-36-105.
When court to appoint arbitrators.

If the arbitration agreement
provides a method of appointment of arbitrators this method shall
be followed. In the absence thereof, or if the agreed method fails
or for any reason cannot be followed, or when an arbitrator fails
or is unable to act and his successor has not been appointed, the
court on application of a party shall appoint one (1) or more arbitrators.
An arbitrator so appointed has all the powers of one specifically
named in the agreement.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 116, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 1-1048.5; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-37-105

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and effect under state law of arbitration agreement provision for alternative method of appointment of arbitrator where one party fails or refuses to follow appointment procedure specified in agreement, 75 ALR5th 595.

Validity and effect under Federal Arbitration Act (9 U.S.C. § 1 et seq.) of arbitration agreement provision for alternative
method of appointment of arbitrator where one party fails or refuses
to follow appointment procedure specified in agreement,
159 ALR Fed 1.

§ 1-36-106.
Powers of arbitrators.

The powers of the arbitrators
may be exercised by a majority unless otherwise provided by the agreement
or by law.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 116, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 1-1048.6; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-37-106

.

§ 1-36-107.
Notice and hearing.

The arbitrators shall appoint a time and place for the hearing and serve the parties with notice either personally or by registered mail not less than five (5) days before the hearing. Appearance at the hearing waives the notice. The arbitrators may adjourn the hearing from time to time as necessary, and on request of a party or upon their own motion may postpone the hearing to a time not later than the date fixed by the agreement for making the award, unless the parties consent to a later date. The arbitrators may hear and determine the controversy upon the evidence produced notwithstanding the failure of a party duly notified to appear. The court on application may direct the arbitrators to proceed promptly with the hearing and determination of the controversy.

The parties are entitled to be heard, to present evidence material to the controversy and to cross-examine witnesses appearing at the hearing.

The hearing shall be conducted by all the arbitrators but a majority may determine any question and render a final award. If during the course of the hearing an arbitrator for any reason ceases to act, the remaining arbitrator or arbitrators may continue with the hearing and determination of the controversy.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 116, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 1-1048.7; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-37-107

.

§ 1-36-108.
Right to be represented by attorney; effect of waiver.

A party may be represented
by an attorney at any arbitration proceeding or hearing. A waiver
of representation prior to the proceeding is ineffective.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 116, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 1-1048.8; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-37-108

.

§ 1-36-109.
Authority of arbitrators to issue subpoenas and administer oaths;
service of subpoenas; depositions; compelling person to testify; witness
fees.

The arbitrators may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses, for the production of books, records, documents and other evidence and may administer oaths. Subpoenas issued shall be served, and upon application to the court by a party or the arbitrators, enforced in the manner provided by law for the service and enforcement of subpoenas in a civil action.

On application of a party and for use as evidence, the arbitrators may permit a deposition to be taken of a witness who cannot be subpoenaed or is unable to attend the hearing, in the manner designated by the arbitrators.

All provisions of law compelling a person under subpoena to testify are applicable.

The same fees for attendance as a witness shall be paid as for a witness in the district court.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 116, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 1-1048.9; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-37-109

.

Cross references. —

As to witnesses generally, see §

1-12-101

et seq.

As to witness fees, see §

1-14-102

.

As to subpoenas, see Rule 45, W.R.C.P.

§ 1-36-110.
Award of arbitrators.

The award shall be in writing and signed by the arbitrators joining in the decision. A copy shall be delivered to each party personally, or by registered mail or as provided in the agreement.

An award shall be made within the time fixed by the agreement, or if not so fixed, within such time as the court orders on application of a party. The parties may extend the time in writing either before or after the expiration thereof. A party waives the objection that an award was not made within the time required unless he notifies the arbitrators of his objection prior to the delivery of the award to him.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 116, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 1-1048.10; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-37-110

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Modern status of rules respecting concurrence of all arbitrators as condition of binding award under private agreement not specifying unanimity, 83 ALR3d 996.

Arbitrator's power to award punitive damages, 83 ALR3d 1037.

Referee's failure to file report within time specified by statute, court order or stipulation as terminating reference, 71 ALR4th 889.

Re-exhaustion of arbitration procedure as appropriate course for resolving backpay issues arising as a result of resolution of grievance, 59 ALR Fed 501.

§ 1-36-111.
Modification of award.

On application of a party or an order of the court, the arbitrators may modify the award:

When there was an evident miscalculation of figures or description of a person or property referred to in the award;

When the award is imperfect as to form not affecting the merits of the controversy; or

For the purpose of clarifying the award.

The application shall be made within twenty (20) days after delivery of the award to the applicant. Written notice shall be given promptly to the opposing party, stating he must serve his objections within ten (10) days from receipt of the notice. The award as modified is subject to the provisions of W.S.

1-36-113

,

1-36-114

and

1-36-115

.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 116, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 1-1048.11; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-37-111

.

Quoted

in

T & M Properties v. ZVFK Architects & Planners, 661 P.2d 1040,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1983).

§ 1-36-112.
Expenses and fees for arbitrators.

The arbitrators’ expenses,
fees and other costs, not including counsel fees, incurred in the
arbitration shall be paid as provided in the award, unless otherwise
provided in the arbitration agreement.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 116, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 1-1048.12; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-37-112

.

§ 1-36-113.
Confirmation of award by court.

Upon application of a
party the court shall confirm the award unless within the time limits
allowed grounds are urged for vacating or modifying the award.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 116, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 1-1048.13; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-37-113

.

Mootness. —

Where an arbitration award for costs had been satisfied and no controversy remained, the doctrine of mootness prohibited a trial court from entering judgment confirming the award. Stewart Title Guar. Co. v. Tilden, 2003 WY 31, 64 P.3d 739,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 2003).

Ways of presenting reasons for vacating awards. —

There are two ways in which a party may present reasons for vacating an award: (1) by filing a petition with the trial court to vacate the award; or (2) by raising reasons supporting vacation in an answer, filed within the 90-day time limit of § 1-36-114(b), to the other party's petition to confirm. T & M Properties v. ZVFK Architects & Planners, 661 P.2d 1040,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1983).

Arbitration award properly confirmed. —

District court did not have any basis to question an arbitration award and properly confirmed it in accordance with Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-36-113

because there was nothing in the record to indicate that a debtor filed a motion to vacate, modify, or correct the arbitration award, or otherwise objected to the award under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-36-114

and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-36-115

.
Vogt v. MBNA Am. Bank, 2008 WY 26, 178 P.3d 405,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 2008).

Cited

in

Dorr, Keller, Bentley & Pecha v. Dorr, Bentley & Pecha, 841 P.2d 811,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 1992); Stewart Title Guar. Co. v. Tilden, 2005 WY 53, 110 P.3d 865,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(2005).

§ 1-36-114.
When court
to vacate award.

Upon application of a party the court shall vacate an award where:

The award was procured by corruption, fraud or other undue means;

There was evident partiality by an arbitrator appointed as a neutral, corruption of any of the arbitrators or misconduct prejudicing the rights of any party;

The arbitrators exceeded their powers;

The arbitrators refused to postpone the hearing upon sufficient cause being shown, refused to hear evidence material to the controversy or otherwise conducted the hearing as to prejudice substantially the rights of a party; or

There was no arbitration agreement, the issue was not adversely determined by a court as provided by law and the applicant did not participate in the arbitration hearing without raising the objection. The fact that the relief was such that it could not or would not be granted by a court of law or equity is not a ground for vacating or refusing to confirm the award.

An application for vacating an award shall be made within ninety (90) days after delivery of a copy of the award to the applicant, or if predicated upon corruption, fraud or other undue means it shall be made within ninety (90) days after the grounds are known or should have been known.

In vacating the award on grounds other than stated in paragraph (a)(v) of this section the court may order a rehearing before new arbitrators chosen as provided in the agreement or by the court in accordance with W.S.

1-36-105

. If the award is vacated on grounds set forth in paragraph (a)(iii) or (iv) of this section the court may order a rehearing before the arbitrators who made the award or their successors appointed in accordance with W.S.

1-36-105

. The time within which the agreement requires the award to be made is applicable to the rehearing and commences from the date of the order.

If the application to vacate is denied and no motion to modify or correct the award is pending, the court shall confirm the award.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 116, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 1-1048.14; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-37-114

; 2009, ch. 169, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “in paragraph (a)(v) of this section the” for “in subsection (a)(v) the” in the first sentence of (c).

Court may vacate arbitration award on nonstatutory grounds.
—

When an applicant pleads and proves one of the grounds set out in subsection (a) is not the only time an arbitration award can be vacated. This section does not prohibit the district court from vacating an award on other grounds. Texas W. Oil & Gas Corp. v. Fitzgerald, 726 P.2d 1056,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 629

(Wyo. 1986).

When arbitrator exceeds powers. —

An arbitrator exceeds his powers when he decides matters which were not submitted to him. T & M Properties v. ZVFK Architects & Planners, 661 P.2d 1040,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1983).

The trial court properly vacated an award for consequential damages since no claim for such damages was properly made under the procedure plaintiff had agreed to in a submission agreement, leaving the arbitrator with no authority to award such damages. JBC of Wyoming Corp. v. Cheyenne, 843 P.2d 1190,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 1992).

Acceptance in part. —

Acceptance by the parties of a divisible part of the award does not estop the objecting party from challenging validity and justness of the other part. Waisner v. Waisner, 15 Wyo. 420, 89 P. 580,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1907).

Mistake. —

A mistake, though honestly made, which would work a fraud on either party, is sufficient ground for impeaching a statutory award upon grounds of fraud, and therefore to vitiate it. Waisner v. Waisner, 15 Wyo. 420, 89 P. 580,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1907).

Ways of presenting reasons for vacating awards. —

There are two ways in which a party may present reasons for vacating an award: (1) by filing a petition with the trial court to vacate the award; or (2) by raising reasons supporting vacation in an answer, filed within the 90-day time limit of subsection (b), to the other party's petition to confirm. T & M Properties v. ZVFK Architects & Planners, 661 P.2d 1040,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1983).

Filing of petition to confirm does not extend 90-day time period

of subsection (b), within which a request for vacation of the award must be presented. T & M Properties v. ZVFK Architects & Planners, 661 P.2d 1040,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1983).

Time limit not enlarged by procedural review. —

Request for procedural review, pursuant to professional association's “Code of Ethics and Arbitration Manual” did not enlarge time for filing application to vacate arbitration award. Simon v. Teton Bd. of Realtors, 4 P.3d 197,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 2000).

Courts which favor arbitration process are reluctant to disturb arbitrators' just solutions

to controversies. In re Greybull, 560 P.2d 1172,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1977).

Supreme court is not at liberty to choose arithmetic of contractor over computations of arbitrators

with reference to what days should be assigned to the contractor for the assessment of liquidated damages for delays in delivery of pipe for a water line project. In re Greybull, 560 P.2d 1172,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1977).

Basis for award where contract has broad arbitration provision.
—

Arbitrators are free to base their award on facts or methods of computation other than those which the parties stipulated where contract provides for a broad submission of “all questions and controversies” to arbitration. In re Greybull, 560 P.2d 1172,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1977).

Expense of fence not a claim for damages. —

Arbitrators exceeded their authority when they compensated a landowner for the construction of a stack yard fence the landowner had constructed as a measure to avoid further damage by wildlife; this expense was not a claim for damage within §

23-1-901

.State, Wyo. Game & Fish Comm'n v. Thornock, 851 P.2d 1300,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1993).

Award confirmation proper in absence of objection. —

District court did not have any basis to question an arbitration award and properly confirmed it in accordance with Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-36-113

because there was nothing in the record to indicate that a debtor filed a motion to vacate, modify, or correct the arbitration award, or otherwise objected to the award under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-36-114

and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-36-115

.
Vogt v. MBNA Am. Bank, 2008 WY 26, 178 P.3d 405,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 2008).

No error in refusing to vacate award. —

Pursuant to the reasons articulated in this section and the bases set forth in case law, the district court did not err in refusing to vacate an arbitration award. There was evidence to support plaintiff's claim that her former husband's parents had promised to repay loans made over period of 12 years when plaintiff and her former husband took over the family run general store business; furthermore, there was evidence that plaintiff relied upon that promise to her detriment by not insisting upon repayment of the loans in the ordinary course of business and making considerable efforts throughout the years to assist with the business. Welty v. Brady, 2005 WY 157, 123 P.3d 920,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 2005).

Quoted

in

Dorr, Keller, Bentley & Pecha v. Dorr, Bentley & Pecha, 841 P.2d 811,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 1992).

Cited

in

Fox v. Tanner, 2004 WY 157, 101 P.3d 939,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(2004).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Admissibility of affidavit or testimony of arbitrator to impeach or explain award, 80 ALR3d 155.

What constitutes corruption, fraud, or undue means in obtaining arbitration award justifying avoidance of award under state law, 22 ALR4th 366.

Setting aside arbitration award on ground of interest or bias of arbitrator — labor disputes, 66 ALR5th 611.

Setting aside arbitration award on ground of interest or bias of arbitrators — commercial, business, or real estate transactions, 67 ALR5th 179.

§ 1-36-115.
When court to modify or correct award.

Upon application made within ninety (90) days after delivery of a copy of the award to the applicant, the court shall modify or correct the award where:

There was an evident miscalculation of figures or an evident mistake in the description of any person or property referred to in the award;

The arbitrators awarded upon a matter not submitted to them and the award may be corrected without affecting the merits of the decision upon the issues submitted; or

The award is imperfect in a matter of form, not affecting the merits of the controversy.

If the application is granted, the court shall modify and correct the award as to intent and shall confirm the award as so modified and corrected. Otherwise the court shall confirm the award as made.

An application to modify or correct an award may be joined in the alternative with an application to vacate the award.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 116, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 1-1048.15; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-37-115

.

Courts which favor arbitration process are reluctant to disturb arbitrators' just solutions

to controversies. In re Greybull, 560 P.2d 1172,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1977).

Supreme court is not at liberty to choose arithmetic of contractor over computations of arbitrators

with reference to what days should be assigned to the contractor for the assessment of liquidated damages for delays in delivery of pipe for a water line project. In re Greybull, 560 P.2d 1172,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1977).

Basis for award where contract has broad arbitration provision.
—

Arbitrators are free to base their award on facts or methods of computation other than those which the parties stipulated where contract provides for a broad submission of “all questions and controversies” to arbitration. In re Greybull, 560 P.2d 1172,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1977).

Award confirmation proper in absence of objection. —

District court did not have any basis to question an arbitration award and properly confirmed it in accordance with Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-36-113

because there was nothing in the record to indicate that a debtor filed a motion to vacate, modify, or correct the arbitration award, or otherwise objected to the award under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-36-114

and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-36-115

.
Vogt v. MBNA Am. Bank, 2008 WY 26, 178 P.3d 405,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 2008).

Trial court properly modified arbitrator's award in the proper amount under subsection (a)(i),

as the arbitrator's offset of $40,000 due under a lease-sale of trucks was improper, inasmuch as the figure used by the arbitrator for the balance remaining to be paid under the lease had already been reduced by $40,000 for the sale of the trucks. Althoff, Inc. v. IFG Leasing Co., 704 P.2d 1302,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 532

(Wyo. 1985).

Quoted

in

Dorr, Keller, Bentley & Pecha v. Dorr, Bentley & Pecha, 841 P.2d 811,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 1992); Simon v. Teton Bd. of Realtors, 4 P.3d 197,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 2000).

Modification of award warranted. —

Modification of arbitrators’ award compensating a ranger for calf damage sustained during a particular grazing season from grizzly bear predation was warranted under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-36-115

because the arbitrators made an award on a matter not submitted to them. Longwell v. Wyo. Game & Fish Dep’t (In re Claim for Damages filed by Longwell), 2022 WY 56,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(April 28, 2022).